Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.140

Rental of tax-title property on month to month tenancy authorized.

The board of county commissioners of any county may, pending sale of any county property acquired by foreclosure of delinquent taxes or amounts deferred under chapter 84.37 or 84.38 RCW, rent any portion thereof on a tenancy from month to month. From the proceeds of the rentals the board of county commissioners must first pay all expense in management of said property and in repairing, maintaining and insuring the improvements thereon. The balance of said proceeds must first be paid to reimburse the county for the costs of foreclosure and sale as defined in RCW 36.35.110. The remainder of the proceeds, if any, must be paid to the department of revenue in the amount of any taxes deferred under chapter 84.37 or 84.38 RCW on the property, including accrued interest, outstanding at the time the county acquired the property by tax deed, and then to the various taxing units interested in the taxes levied against said property in the same proportion as the current tax levies of the taxing units having levies against said property.

[ 2013 c 221 s 3; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.310. Prior: 1945 c 170 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 11298-1. Formerly RCW 84.64.310.]